Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB36.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of allowing individuals twenty-one years of age or
older to possess, use, buy, or sell one ounce or less of cannabis and to cultivate, harvest,
and store up to five cannabis plants for personal use, and to allow the production,
processing, and sale of cannabis to be regulated and controlled by the General Assembly
by amending the Constitution of Kentucky to read as stated below?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The right of an individual twenty-one years of age or older to possess, use,
buy, or sell one ounce or less of cannabis shall be guaranteed in this state and shall not
be subject to any criminal sanction.
(2) The right of an individual twenty-one years of age or older to cultivate,
harvest, and store up to five cannabis plants for personal use shall be guaranteed in
this state and shall not be subject to any criminal sanction.
(3) The General Assembly may by general law regulate and control the
production, processing, and sale of cannabis and cannabis-derived products.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 966
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision in KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision in KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the amendment and the question, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed